fr: arôme naturel de vin blanc
bg: естествен аромат на бяло вино
de: natürliches Weißweinaroma
es: aroma natural de vino blanco
fi: luontainen valkoviiniaromi
hu: természetes fehérbor aroma
it: aroma naturale di vino bianco
nl: natuurlijk witte wijnaroma
pl: naturalny aromat białego wina
pt: sabor a vinho branco
ro: aromă naturală de vin alb
sv: naturlig vitvinsarom

en: butter flavouring
bg: ароматизант масло
de: butteraroma, butter-aroma
es: aroma de mantequilla
fi: voiaromi
fr: arôme de beurre
hr: aroma-maslaca
it: aroma di burro
pl: aromat maślany, aromat masła
ru: ароматизатор масла, ароматизатор идентичный натуральному сливки
sv: smörarom

en: garlic flavouring
bg: аромат чесън, аромат на чесън
ca: aroma d'all
de: Knoblauch-Aroma, Knoblaucharoma
es: aroma de ajo
fi: valkosipuliaromi
fr: arôme d'ail
hr: aroma češnjaka
it: aroma di aglio
pl: aromat czosnku, aromaty czosnku, aromat czosnkowy
sv: vitlökarom, vitlöksarom

en: blackcurrant flavouring
da: solbæraroma
de: Schwarzes Johannisbeeraroma
es: aroma de grosella
fi: mustaherukka-aromi, mustaherukka-aromia
fr: arôme cassis
hr: aroma crnog ribiza
it: aroma di ribes nero
nb: solbær aroma
pl: aromat czarnej porzeczki
sv: svartvinbärsarom

en: lime flavouring
de: limettenaroma
es: aroma de lima
fi: limettiaromi
fr: arôme de citron vert
hr: aroma limete
it: aroma di lime
sv: limearom

en: blueberry flavouring
de: Heidelbeeraroma, Heidelbeer-Aroma
es: aroma de arándano
fi: mustikka-aromi
fr: arôme de myrtille
hr: aroma borovnice
it: aroma di mirtillo
sv: blåbärsarom

en: dill flavouring
da: dildaroma
de: Dill-Aroma, Dillaroma
es: aroma de eneldo
fi: tilliaromi
fr: arôme d'aneth
hr: aroma kopra
hu: kapor aroma
it: aroma di aneto
sv: dillarom

en: natural sea-buckthorn flavouring
de: natürliches Sanddornaroma
fi: luontainen tyrniaromi
fr: arôme naturel de baie d'argousier
hr: prirodna aroma krkavine
sv: naturlig havtornsarom

en: juniper berry flavouring
de: Wacholderbeerenaroma
fi: katajanmarja-aromi
hr: aroma bobica kleke
it: aroma di bacche di ginepro
sv: enbärsarom

en: horseradish flavouring
de: Meerrettich-Aroma
fi: piparjuuriaromi
fr: arôme de raifort
hr: aroma hrena
it: aroma di rafano
pl: aromat chrzanu
ru: аромат хрена
sv: pepparrotsarom

en: natural hops flavouring
de: natürliches Hopfenaroma
fi: luontainen humala-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de houblon
hr: prirodna aroma hmelja
it: luppolo naturale
sv: naturlig humlearom

en: malt flavouring
de: Malz-Aroma, Malzaroma
es: aroma de malta
fi: mallasaromi
fr: arôme de malt
hr: aroma slada
it: aroma di malto
sv: maltarom

en: barley malt flavouring
de: Gerstenmalzaroma
es: aroma de malta de cebada
fi: ohramallasaromi
fr: arôme de malt d'orge
hr: aroma ječmenog slada
it: aroma di malto d'orzo
sv: kornmaltarom

en: natural malt flavouring
de: Natürliches Malzaroma
fi: luontainen mallasaromi
fr: arôme naturel de malt
hr: prirodna aroma slada
it: aroma naturale di malto
sv: naturlig maltarom

en: cream flavouring
da: flødearoma
de: sahnearoma
es: aroma de nata
fi: kerma-aromi
fr: arôme de crème
hr: aroma vrhnja
it: aroma di panna
pl: aromat śmietankowy

en: shrimp flavouring
de: Garnelenaroma, Garnelen-Aroma
es: aroma de camarón
fi: katkarapuaromi
fr: arôme de crevette
hr: aroma za škampe
it: aroma di gamberetto
sv: räkarom

en: natural asparagus flavouring
de: natürliches Spargel-Aroma
fi: luontainen parsa-aromi
hr: prirodna aroma šparoga
it: aroma naturale di asparagi
sv: naturlig sparrisarom

en: natural parsley flavouring
de: natürliches petersilienaroma
fi: luontainen persilja-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de persil
hr: prirodna aroma peršina
it: aroma naturale di prezzemolo
sv: naturlig persiljearom

en: mushroom flavouring
de: Pilzaroma, Pilz-Aroma
es: aroma de champiñón
fi: sieniaromi
fr: arôme champignon
hr: aroma gljiva
it: aroma di funghi
nl: paddenstoelaroma
pl: aromat grzybowy
ru: ароматизатор грибов
sv: champinjonarom

en: natural clove flavoring
de: natürliches Nelkenaroma
es: aroma natural de clavo
fr: arôme naturel de clou de girofle
hr: prirodna aroma klinčića
it: aroma naturale di chiodo di garofano
nl: natuurlijke kruidnagelsmaak
pl: naturalny aromat goździkowy, naturalny aromat goździków
pt: sabor natural de cravo